Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
CONSUMER CREDIT CODE

Editor's note:

When originally enacted in 1971, articles 1 through 3 and 4 through 6 were based upon the Uniform Consumer Credit Code promulgated by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws; however it has been substantially amended in subsequent years and was the subject of a major rewrite in the 2000 session based upon recommendations of the office of the attorney general.